District of Columbia statutes.
19-101.04

Family allowance.

(a)

In addition to the right to homestead allowance and exempt property, the decedent’s surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner, and minor children whom the decedent was obligated to support and children who were in fact being supported by the decedent are entitled to a reasonable allowance in money out of the estate for their maintenance during the period of administration. It is payable to the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner, if living, for the use of the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner and the decedent’s surviving minor and dependent children; otherwise to the children, or persons having their care and custody. If a minor child or dependent child is not living with the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner, the allowance may be made partially to the child or his or her guardian, or other person having the child’s care and custody, and partially to the spouse or domestic partner, as their needs may appear. The family allowance is exempt from and has priority over all claims, except the homestead allowance, and as provided in section 20-906.

(b)

The family allowance is not chargeable against any benefit or share passing to the surviving spouse, surviving domestic partner, or children by the will of the decedent, unless otherwise provided, by intestate succession, or by way of elective share. The death of any person entitled to family allowance terminates the right to allowances not yet paid.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 801(c), 48 DCR 2087
Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-79, § 5(e), 53 DCR 1035

Section References

This section is referenced in § 19-1305.05 and § 20-906.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-79 rewrote the section.